Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2.3 Government Oversight and Fiscal Accountability Review Act

37-2.3-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Government Oversight and Fiscal Accountability Review Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 646, § 1.

37-2.3-2.
Legislative intent.

The legislature finds and declares that using private contractors to provide public services normally provided by public employees does not always promote the public interest. To ensure that citizens of this state receive high quality public services at low costs, with due regard for the taxpayers of this state, and the service recipients, the legislature finds it necessary to ensure that access to public information guaranteed by the access to public records act is not in any way hindered by the fact that public services are provided by private contractors.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 646, § 1.

37-2.3-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Agency” includes any executive office, department, division, board, commission, or other office or officer in the executive branch of the government.

“Person” includes an individual, institution, federal, state, or local governmental entity, or any other public or private entity.

“Private contractor employee” includes a worker directly employed by a private contractor, as defined in this section, as well as an employee of a subcontractor or an independent contractor that provides supplies or services to a private contractor.

“Privatization or privatization contract” means an agreement or combination or series of agreements by which a non-governmental person or entity agrees with an agency to provide services expected to result in a fiscal year expenditure of at least one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), which would contract services which are substantially similar to and in replacement of work normally performed by an employee of an agency.

“Privatization” or “privatization contract” excludes:

Contracts resulting from an emergency procurement;

Contracts with a term of one hundred eighty (180) days or less on a non-recurring basis;

Contracts to provide highly specialized or technical services not normally provided by state employees;

Any subsequent contract which renews or rebids a privatization contract that was subject to the provisions of this statute after its enactment; and

An agreement to provide legal services or management consulting services.

“Privatization contractor” is any vendor, contractor, consultant, subcontractor, independent contractor or private business owner that contracts with a state agency to perform services in accordance with the definition of a “privatization contract.”

“Services” includes, with respect to a private contractor, all aspects of the provision of services provided by a private contractor pursuant to a privatization contract, or any services provided by a subcontractor of a private contractor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 646, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 121, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 139, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 35; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 9, § 3.

37-2.3-4.
Fiscal monitoring of privatization contracts.

Each private contractor shall file a copy of each executed subcontract or amendment to the subcontract with the agency, which shall maintain the subcontract or amendment as a public record, as defined in the access to public records act.

Audits. Privatization contracts shall be subject to audit or review, as defined by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, by the office of the auditor general at the discretion of the auditor general. Any audit or review shall be conducted in compliance with generally accepted auditing standards.

Access. All privatization contracts shall include a contract provision specifying language that provides public access to the complete contract.

Fiscal accountability. As part of the budgetary process, each state agency shall include in their submitted budget request a listing of all privatization contracts for the prior, current and subsequent fiscal years. For the prior fiscal year, the listing shall include the name of each contractor; a description of the services provided; the amount expended for the fiscal year; the positions employed by title, if applicable; and the hourly wage paid by position, if applicable. For the current and upcoming fiscal years, the listing shall include the name of each contractor, if known at the time the listing is prepared; a description of the services to be provided; the amount budgeted for the contract in each fiscal year; the positions to be employed by title, if known and applicable; and the hourly wage to be paid by position, if known and applicable. Positions shall be reflected as full-time equivalent positions. The listings shall be published annually online at the state’s transparency portal or an equivalent website, available for public inspection, no later than December 1 of each year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 646, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 9, § 3.